Nebraska, session 109, LB715.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB715 LB715
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, (a) any individual
or group sickness and accident insurance policy or subscriber contract
delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any
hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for
policies that provide coverage for a specified disease or other limited-
benefit coverage, and (b) any self-funded employee benefit plan to the
extent not preempted by federal law shall include coverage for pre-
exposure prophylaxis medication for the prevention of human
immunodeficiency virus infection if prescribed by a physician or health
care professional legally authorized by law to prescribe such medication.
(2) This section does not prevent application of deductible or
copayment provisions or network incentives contained in the policy,
contract, or plan.
-2-